zh-CN: 滑翔机航电套件: 模拟 + 电子升降速度表; 基础模拟仪表; 飞行计算机 (GPS); 玻璃/EFIS 式仪表; 其他
hr-HR: Paket avionike jedrilice: Analogni + elektronički variometar; Osnovni analogni instrumenti; Putno računalo (GPS); Stakleni/EFIS instrumenti; Ostalo
fi: Purjelentokoneen mittaristopaketti: Analoginen + elektroninen variometri; Perusanalogiset mittarit; Lentotietokone (GPS); Lasi-/EFIS-tyyppiset mittarit; Muu
it: Pacchetto avionico per aliante: Variometro analogico + elettronico; Strumenti analogici di base; Computer di volo (GPS); Strumenti in stile glass/EFIS; Altro
ko: 글라이더 항공전자 장비 패키지: 아날로그 + 전자식 승강계; 기본 아날로그 계기; 비행 컴퓨터(GPS); 글래스/EFIS 스타일 계기; 기타
sl-SI: Avionični paket za jadralno letalo: Analogni in elektronski variometer; Osnovni analogni instrumenti; Računalnik letenja (GPS); Instrumenti Glass/EFIS; Drugo
pt-BR: Pacote de aviônica para parapente: Variômetro analógico + eletrônico; Instrumentos analógicos básicos; Computador de voo (GPS); Instrumentos estilo Glass/EFIS; Outro
th: ชุดอุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์สำหรับเครื่องร่อน: อะนาล็อก + มาตรความสูงแบบอิเล็กทรอนิกส์; เครื่องมืออะนาล็อกพื้นฐาน; คอมพิวเตอร์การบิน (GPS); เครื่องมือวัดแบบกระจก/EFIS; อื่นๆ
sv: Avionikpaket för glidflygplan: Analog och elektronisk variometer; Grundläggande analoga instrument; Färddator (GPS); Glas-/EFIS-liknande instrument; Övrigt
es: Paquete de aviónica para planeadores: Variómetro analógico y electrónico; Instrumentos analógicos básicos; Computadora de vuelo (GPS); Instrumentos tipo Glass/EFIS; Otro
da: Avionikpakke til svævefly: Analogt + elektronisk variometer; Grundlæggende analoge instrumenter; Flyvecomputer (GPS); Glass/EFIS-lignende instrumenter; Andet
tr: Planör aviyonik paketi: Analog ve elektronik varyometre; Temel analog aletler; Uçuş bilgisayarı (GPS); Cam/EFIS stili aletler; Diğer
pl: Pakiet awioniki szybowca: Wariometr analogowy + elektroniczny; Podstawowe przyrządy analogowe; Komputer pokładowy (GPS); Przyrządy typu Glass / EFIS; Inne
ro-RO: Pachetul de avionică al planorului.: Variometru analog + electronic; Instrumente analogice de bază; Computer de zbor (GPS); Instrumente tip EFIS/Ecran; Altele
el: Πακέτο αεροηλεκτρονικών συστημάτων για ανεμόπτερα: Αναλογικό + ηλεκτρονικό βαριόμετρο; Βασικά αναλογικά όργανα; Υπολογιστής πτήσης (GPS); Όργανα τύπου Glass/EFIS; Άλλο
bg-BG: Пакет авионика за безмоторен самолет: Аналогов + електронен вариометър; Основни аналогови инструменти; Полетен компютър (GPS); Стъклена кабина/инструменти тип EFIS; Друго
ja: グライダー用アビオニクスパッケージ: アナログ + 電子バリオメーター; 基本アナログ計器; フライトコンピューター (GPS); グラス / EFIS スタイルの計器; その他
sk-SK: Avionický balík pre vetroň: Analógový + elektronický variometer; Základné analógové prístroje; Letový počítač (GPS); Prístroje typu Glass/EFIS; Iné
fr: Ensemble avionique du planeur: Variomètre analogique + électronique; Instruments analogiques de base; Ordinateur de vol (GPS); Instruments de type Glass cockpit/EFIS; Autre
lt-LT: Sklandytuvo avionikos paketas: Analoginis + elektroninis variometras; Pagrindiniai analoginiai prietaisai; Skrydžio kompiuteris (GPS); Stiklinės kabinos / EFIS prietaisai; Kita
pt-PT: Pacote de aviónica para planador: Variómetro analógico + eletrónico; Instrumentos analógicos básicos; Computador de voo (GPS); Instrumentos digitais/estilo EFIS; Outro
de: Avionikpaket des Segelflugzeugs: Analoges und elektronisches Variometer; Analoge Basisinstrumente; Bordrechner (GPS); Glascockpit/EFIS-Instrumente; Sonstige
vi: Gói thiết bị điện tử hàng không cho tàu lượn: Đồng hồ cơ + áp kế điện tử; Thiết bị đo cơ học cơ bản; Máy tính bay (GPS); Buồng lái kính/Thiết bị kiểu EFIS; Khác
nb: Avionikkpakke for glidefly: Analog og elektronisk variometer; Grunnleggende analoge instrumenter; Flydatamaskin (GPS); Glass-/EFIS-instrumenter; Annet
en: Glider avionics package: Analog + electronic variometer; Basic analog instruments; Flight computer (GPS); Glass/EFIS-style instruments; Other
ru: Комплект авионики планера: Аналоговый + электронный вариометр; Базовые аналоговые приборы; Бортовой компьютер (GPS); Стеклянная кабина / приборы типа EFIS; Другое
nl: Zweefvliegtuig avionicspakket: Analoge + elektronische variometer; Standaard analoge instrumenten; Vluchtcomputer (gps); Glass/EFIS-achtige instrumenten; Overig
hu: Siklóernyő avionikai csomag: Analóg + elektronikus variométer; Alapvető analóg műszerek; Fedélzeti számítógép (GPS); Képernyős (Glass/EFIS típusú) műszerek; Egyéb
cs: Balíček avioniky kluzáku: Analogový a elektronický variometr; Základní analogové přístroje; Letový počítač (GPS); Přístroje typu Glass/EFIS; Ostatní
zh-TW: 滑翔機航電套件: 類比 + 電子升降速率表; 基本類比儀表; 飛行電腦 (GPS); 玻璃座艙/EFIS 樣式儀表; 其他